Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3509
County board; tax levy; amount.

The county board may annually levy a tax upon all of the taxable property within the county sufficient to defray the amount required for such maintenance and improvement as certified to it by the board of trustees.

Laws 1945, c. 44, § 9, p. 211;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.08;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 111;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 40.